California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 measure the distribution of the standardized materials for purposes of evaluating and improving the degree to which foster youth are adequately informed of their rights. This data shall be included in the compilation prepared pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 297, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16165.

As part of the office’s efforts to resolve complaints related to foster care, the ombudsperson may do all of the following:

(a) Establish policies and procedures for receiving and processing complaints, conducting investigations, and reporting findings.

(b) Conduct whatever investigation reasonably related to the complaint and to foster care that the ombudsperson deems necessary, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) Access to, and inspection of, premises within the control of a state or local agency or a contractor with a state and local agency, and access to, and inspection of, a licensed or approved children’s residential facility, at any time, with or without prior
 notice, for the purpose of carrying out the duties of the office. The ombudsperson shall be granted access to records and residents at all times for the purpose of carrying out the duties of the office.

(A) For purposes of this section, “access” means the right to do all of the following:

(i) Enter any licensed or approved children’s residential facility, upon providing identification.

(ii) Communicate privately and without restriction with any resident, caregiver, personnel, or volunteer.

(iii) Review and copy any resident record or caregiver file.

(iv) Observe all resident and staff areas of a facility.

(v) Review and reproduce administrative records, policies, and documents of any licensed or approved children’s residential care facility.

(vi) Review and copy all licensing records maintained by the state, county, or agency, and review and reproduce any records of a state, county, or local agency and their contractors, except sealed court records, which may be obtained only by subpoena or other lawful court order.

(vii) Interview all relevant witnesses.

(B) For purposes of this section, “record” means a document, paper, memorandum, book, letter, file, drawing, map, plat, photo, photographic file, motion picture, film, microfilm,
 microphotograph, exhibit, magnetic or paper tape, punched card, or other item developed or received under law or in connection with the transaction of official business, but does not include material that is protected by privilege.

(2) Observe proceedings and attend hearings, consistent with Section 346.

(c) Attempt to resolve the complaint.

(d) Submit a written plan to the relevant state or county agency, or a contractor with the state or local agency, recommending a course of action to resolve the complaint. If the ombudsperson makes a written recommendation, the state or county agency, or contractor, shall submit a written response to the ombudsperson within 30 calendar
 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 293, Sec. 5.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16166.

In order to encourage candor during the ombudsperson’s investigation of complaints made by or on behalf of foster youth and to facilitate the ombudsperson’s ability to resolve complaints, all of the following shall apply:

(a) The ombudsperson and staff of the ombudsperson shall not be compelled to testify or be deposed in a judicial or administrative proceeding regarding matters coming to their attention in the exercise of their official duties, except as may be necessary to enforce or implement this chapter.

(b) The records of the ombudsperson and the staff of the ombudsperson, including notes, drafts, and records obtained
 from an individual or agency during the intake, review, or investigation of a complaint, and any reports not released to the public shall not be subject to disclosure or production in response to a subpoena or discovery in a judicial or administrative proceeding, except as necessary to enforce or implement the provisions of this chapter.

(c) When exercising the investigative, complaint resolution, and technical assistance functions of the Office of the State Foster Care Ombudsperson, the ombudsperson and staff of the ombudsperson shall have all immunities under Article 2 (commencing with Section 815) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code afforded to the discharge of discretionary duties by public entities and their employees.

(d) If the
 ombudsperson believes, based on information received during the exercise of their official duties, that there is a breach of duty or misconduct by an employee of a state or local agency or their contractors in the conduct of the employees’ official duties, the ombudsperson shall refer the matter to the agency director or other responsible officer, and if the conduct would constitute a crime, to an appropriate law enforcement body or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 293, Sec. 6.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16167.

(a) A toll-free number shall be established for the office.

(b) Social workers and probation officers shall provide foster children with the toll-free telephone number for the office and verbal or written information regarding the existence and purpose of the office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 293, Sec. 7.   (AB 317)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Interstate Adoption Assistance Agreements [16170. - 16177.]

16170.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Finding adoptive families for children, for whom state assistance is desirable pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115), and assuring the protection of the interests of the children affected during the entire assistance period, require special measures when the adoptive parents move to other states or are residents of another state.

(b) Provision of medical and other necessary services for children, with state assistance, encounters special difficulties when the provision of services takes place in other states.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16171.

The purposes of this chapter are to:

(a) Authorize the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Services to enter into interstate agreements with agencies of other states for the protection of children on behalf of whom adoption assistance is being provided by the State Department of Social Services.

(b) Provide procedures for interstate children’s adoption assistance payments, including medical payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16172.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(a) “Adoption assistance state” means the state that is signatory to an adoption assistance agreement in a particular case.

(b) “Residence state” means the state where the child is living.

(c) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, or a territory or possession of or administered by the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16173.

The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Services are authorized to develop, participate in the development of, negotiate, or enter into one or more interstate compacts on behalf of this state with other states to implement one or more of the purposes set forth in this chapter. When entered into, and for so long as it shall remain in force, a compact shall have the force and effect of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16174.

A compact entered into pursuant to the authority conferred by this chapter shall contain all of the following:

(a) A provision making it available for joinder by all states.

(b) A provision for withdrawal from the compact upon written notice to the parties, with a period of one year between the date of the notice and the effective date of the withdrawal.

(c) A requirement that the protections afforded by the compact continue in force for the duration of the adoption assistance and be applicable to all children and their adoptive parents who on the effective date of the withdrawal are receiving adoption assistance from a party state other than the one in which they are resident and have their principal place of abode.

(d) A requirement that each instance of adoption assistance to which the compact applies be covered by an adoption assistance agreement in writing between the adoptive parents and the state child welfare agency of the state which undertakes to provide the adoption assistance, and further, that any such agreement be expressly for the benefit of the adopted child and enforceable by the adoptive parents, and the state agency providing the adoption assistance.

(e) Any other provision as may be appropriate to implement the proper administration of the compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16175.

A compact entered into pursuant to the authority conferred by this chapter may contain provisions in addition to those required pursuant to Section 16174, as follows:

(a) Provisions establishing procedures and entitlement to medical and other necessary social services for the child in accordance with applicable laws, even though the child and the adoptive parents are in a state other than the one responsible for or providing the services or the funds to defray part or all of the costs thereof.

(b) Any other provision as may be appropriate or incidental to the proper administration of the compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16176.

(a) (1) Any child who is a resident of California and who is the subject of a state-only adoption assistance agreement with another state, shall be eligible to receive Medi-Cal benefits whether or not there is a cash benefit.

(2) Any child with special needs who is the subject of a state-only adoption assistance agreement with California shall continue to be eligible for Medi-Cal benefits if the child is placed out-of-state or with his or her adoptive family, moves out-of-state, and the receiving state does not provide Medicaid benefits to the child.

(b) The departments shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16177.

Consistent with federal law, the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Services, in connection with the administration of this chapter and any compact pursuant thereto, shall include in any state plan made pursuant to the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare of 1980 (Public Law 96-272), Titles IV (e) and XIX of the Social Security Act, or any other applicable federal laws, the provision of adoption assistance and medical assistance for which the federal government pays some or all the cost. The departments shall apply for and administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 887, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Child Welfare Training [16200. - 16215.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16200. - 16200.]

16200.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this section shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “ Program” means the Child Welfare Training Program.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1310, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Child Welfare Training Program [16205. - 16208.]

16205.

The department shall select and award a grant to a private nonprofit or public entity for the purpose of establishing a statewide multipurpose child welfare training program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1310, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16206.

(a) The purpose of the program is to develop and implement statewide coordinated training programs designed specifically to meet the needs of county child protective services social workers assigned emergency response, family maintenance, family reunification, permanent placement, and adoption responsibilities. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program include training for other agencies under contract with county welfare departments to provide child welfare services. In addition, the program shall provide training programs for persons defined as a mandated reporter pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code). The program shall provide the services required in this section to the extent possible within the total
 allocation. If allocations are insufficient, the department, in consultation with the grantee or grantees and the Child Welfare Training Advisory Board, shall prioritize the efforts of the program, giving primary attention to the most urgently needed services. County child protective services social workers assigned emergency response responsibilities shall receive first priority for training pursuant to this section.

(b) The training program shall provide practice-relevant training for mandated child abuse reporters and all members of the child welfare delivery system that will address critical issues affecting the well-being of children, and shall develop curriculum materials and training resources for use in meeting staff development needs of mandated child abuse reporters and child welfare personnel in public and private agency settings.

(c) The training provided pursuant to
 this section shall include all of the following:

(1) Crisis intervention.

(2) Investigative techniques.

(3) Rules of evidence.

(4) Indicators of abuse and neglect.

(5) Assessment criteria, including the application of guidelines for assessment of relatives for placement according to the criteria described in Section 361.3.

(6) Intervention strategies.

(7) Legal requirements of child protection, including requirements of child abuse reporting laws.

(8) Case management.

(9) Use of community resources.

(10) Information regarding the dynamics and effects of domestic violence upon families and children, including indicators and dynamics of teen dating violence.

(11) Post-traumatic stress disorder and the causes, symptoms, and treatment of post-traumatic stress disorder in children and the types of and behavioral manifestation of trauma, loss, and grief.

(12) The importance of maintaining relationships with individuals who are important to a child in out-of-home placement, including methods to identify those individuals, consistent with the child’s best interests, including, but not limited to, asking the child about individuals who are important, and ways to maintain and support those relationships.

(13) The legal duties of a child protective services social worker, in order to protect the legal rights and safety of children and families from the initial time of contact during investigation through treatment.

(14) The information described in subdivision (d) of Section 16501.4.

(15) The information described in subdivision (i) of Section 16521.5. The program may use the curriculum created pursuant to subdivision (h), and described in subdivision (i), of Section 16521.5.

(d) The training provided pursuant to this section may also include any or all of the following:

(1) Child development and parenting.

(2) Intake,
 interviewing, and initial assessment.

(3) Casework and treatment.

(4) Medical aspects of child abuse and neglect.

(e) The training program in each county shall assess the program’s performance at least annually and forward it to the State Department of Social Services for an evaluation. The assessment shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Workforce data, including education, qualifications, and demographics.

(2) The number of persons trained.

(3) The type of training provided.

(4) The degree to which the training is perceived by participants as
 useful in practice.

(5) Any additional information or data deemed necessary by the department for reporting, oversight, and monitoring purposes.

(f) The training program shall provide practice-relevant training to county child protective services social workers who screen referrals for child abuse or neglect and for all workers assigned to provide emergency response, family maintenance, family reunification, and permanent placement services. The training shall be developed in consultation with the Child Welfare Training Advisory Board and domestic violence victims’ advocates and other public and private agencies that provide programs for victims of domestic violence or programs of intervention for perpetrators.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 48) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 714, Sec. 3.   (AB 1006)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16207.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to replace training requirements established by the department in regulations contained in Sections 30-196 and 30-272 of the department’s manual of policies and procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1310, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16208.

(a) (1) The department, in consultation with the Child Welfare Training Advisory Board, shall contract with the University of California or the California State University system to develop a statewide protocol for telephone screening of emergency response referrals to protect children from abuse and neglect, to be called the Emergency Response Protocol. The department shall seek the advice of the California Children’s Lobby in the development of this protocol. 

(2) The Emergency Response Protocol shall incorporate written procedures for screening each referral of abuse or neglect to assess whether abuse of another family or household member is occurring. This additional domestic violence assessment and referral criteria shall be developed by the department in consultation with domestic violence victims’ advocates, and other public and private agencies that provide programs for victims of domestic violence or programs of intervention for perpetrators and the County Welfare Directors Association.

(b) The department shall utilize available child welfare training funds in the development of the protocol.

(c) The department shall incorporate the protocol into the child welfare training program described in this article no later than February 15, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1139, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Child Welfare Training Advisory Board [16210. - 16210.]

16210.

(a) The department shall establish a Child Welfare Training Advisory Board to oversee training programs as specified by this chapter.

(b) The advisory board shall be composed of nine members, consisting of representatives from child welfare, legal, judicial, and medical disciplines, and representatives from the public sector, who shall advise the director on the development of training programs and materials and other matters as deemed appropriate by the executive director. The board shall be appointed by the Director of Social Services. The advisory board members shall have demonstrated expertise in areas including, but not limited to, sexual, physical, and emotional abuse of children; infant abuse; adolescent abuse; treatment of physically abused, sexually abused, or emotionally abused minors; and special needs of infants and minors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1310, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Funding [16215. - 16215.]

16215.

The appropriation in support of the Child Welfare Training Program shall be provided annually through the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1310, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. State Child Welfare Services [16500. - 16523.59.]

16500.

The state, through the department and county welfare departments, shall establish and support a public system of statewide child welfare services to be developed as rapidly as possible and to be available in each county of the state. All counties shall establish and maintain specialized organizational entities within the county welfare department which shall have sole responsibility for the operation of the child welfare services program. 

The Legislature hereby declares its intent, in providing for this statewide system
 of child welfare services, that all children are entitled to be safe and free from abuse and neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1084, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to use the strengths of families and communities to serve the needs of children who are alleged to be abused or neglected, as described in Section 300, to reduce the necessity for removing these children from their home, to encourage speedy reunification of families when it can be safely accomplished, to locate permanent homes and families for children who cannot return to their biological families, to reduce the number of placements experienced by these children, to ensure that children leaving the
 foster care system have support within their communities, to improve the quality and homelike nature of out-of-home care, and to foster the educational progress of children in out-of-home care.

(b) In order to achieve the goals specified in subdivision (a), the state shall encourage the development of approaches to child protection that do all of the following:

(1) Allow children to remain in their own schools, in close proximity to their families.

(2) Increase the number and quality of foster families available to serve these children.

(3) Use a team approach to foster care that permits the biological and foster family and the child to be part of that team.

(4) Use team decisionmaking in
 case planning.

(5) Provide support to foster children and foster families.

(6) Ensure that licensing requirements do not create barriers to recruitment of qualified, high-quality foster homes.

(7) Provide training for foster parents and professional staff on working effectively with families and communities.

(8) Encourage foster parents to serve as mentors and role models for biological parents.

(9) Use community resources, including community-based agencies and volunteer organizations, to assist in developing placements for children and to provide support for children and their families.

(10) Ensure an appropriate array of
 placement resources for children in need of out-of-home care.

(11) Ensure that no child leaves foster care without a lifelong connection to a committed adult.

(12) Ensure that children are actively involved in the case plan and permanency planning process.

(c) (1) Each county shall provide the department with a disaster response plan describing how county programs assisted under Part B (commencing with Section 620) and Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code (Titles IV-B and IV-E of the Social Security Act) would respond to a disaster. The plan shall set forth procedures describing how each county will perform the following services:

(A) Identify, locate, and continue
 availability of services for children under state care or supervision who are displaced or adversely affected by a disaster.

(B) Respond, as appropriate, to new child welfare cases in areas adversely affected by a disaster, and provide services in those cases.

(C) Remain in communication with caseworkers and other essential child welfare personnel who are displaced because of a disaster.

(D) Preserve essential program records.

(E) Coordinate services and share information with other counties.

(2) The department shall review its disaster plan with respect to subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1), and shall revise the plan to clarify the role and responsibilities of the state
 in the event of a disaster.

(3) The department shall consult with counties to identify opportunities for collaboration between counties, and between the county and the state, in the event of a disaster.

(d) In carrying out the requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c), the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Consider the existing array of program models provided in statute and in practice, including, but not limited to, wraparound services, as defined in Section 18251, children’s systems of care, as provided for in Section 5852, the Oregon Family Unity or Santa Clara County Family Conference models, which include family conferences at key points in the casework process, such as when out-of-home placement or return home is considered, and the Annie E. Casey Foundation Family to Family initiative, which uses
 team decisionmaking in case planning, community-based placement practices requiring that children be placed in foster care in the communities where they resided prior to placement, and involve foster families as team members in family reunification efforts.

(2) Ensure that emergency response services, family maintenance services, family reunification services, and permanent placement services are coordinated with the implementation of the models described in paragraph (1).

(3) Ensure consistency between child welfare services program regulations and the program models described in paragraph (1).

(e) The department, in conjunction with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, county child welfare services agencies, foster parent and group home associations, the California Youth Connection, and other child advocacy
 groups, shall review the existing child welfare services program regulations to ensure that these regulations are consistent with the legislative intent specified in subdivision (a). This review shall also determine how to incorporate the best practice guidelines for assessment of children and families receiving child welfare and foster care services, as required by Section 16501.2.

(f) The department shall report to the Legislature on the results of the actions taken under this section on or before January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 583, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.5.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby declares its intent to encourage the continuity of the family unit by all of the following:

(A) Consistently providing family preservation services that have a track record of actually helping families.

(B) Ensuring that contracts for family preservation services establish minimum standards for
 tracking and reporting the outcomes of those services.

(C) Providing services that have their outcomes tracked and reported for those children within the meaning of Sections 360, 361, and 364 when they are returned to the family unit or when a minor will probably soon be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 301.

(D) Providing counseling and family support services designed to eradicate the situation that necessitated intervention and that have a track record of actually helping families.

(2) The Legislature finds that maintaining abused and neglected children in foster care grows increasingly costly each year, and that adequate funding for family services
 that might enable these children to remain in their homes is not as readily available as funding for foster care placement.

(3) The Legislature further finds that other state bodies have addressed this problem through various systems of flexible reimbursement in child welfare programs that provide for more intensive and appropriate services to prevent foster care placement or significantly reduce the length of stay in foster care.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that family preservation and support services in California conform to the federal definitions contained in Section 431 of the Social Security Act. The Legislature finds and declares that California’s existing family preservation programs meet the intent of the federal Promoting Safe and Stable Families
 program.

(c) (1) Services that may be provided under this program may include, but are not limited to, counseling, mental health treatment and substance abuse treatment services, including treatment at a residential substance abuse treatment facility that accepts families, parenting, respite, day treatment, transportation, homemaking, and family support services. Each county that chooses to provide mental health treatment and substance abuse treatment shall identify and develop these services in consultation with county mental health treatment and substance abuse treatment agencies. Additional services may include those enumerated in Sections 16506 and 16507. The services to be provided pursuant to this section may be determined by each participating county. Each county may contract with individuals and organizations
 for services to be provided pursuant to this section. Each county shall utilize available private nonprofit resources in the county prior to developing new county-operated resources when these private nonprofit resources are of at least equal quality and costs as county-operated resources and shall utilize available county resources of at least equal quality and cost prior to new private nonprofit resources.

(2) Participating counties authorized by this subdivision shall provide specific programs of direct services based on individual family needs as reflected in the service plans to families of the following:

(A) Children who are dependent children not taken from physical custody of their parents or guardians pursuant to Section 364.

(B) Children who are dependent children removed from the physical custody of their parents or guardian pursuant to Section 361.

(C) Children who it is determined will probably soon be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 301.

(D) Upon approval of the department, children who have been adjudged wards of the court pursuant to Sections 601 and 602.

(E) Upon approval of the department, families of children subject to Sections 726 and 727.

(F) Upon approval of the department, children who are determined to require out-of-home placement.

(3) The services shall only be provided to families whose children will be placed in out-of-home care without the provision of services or to children who can be returned to their families with the provision of services.

(4) (A) (i) The services selected by a participating county shall be reasonable and meritorious and shall demonstrate cost-effectiveness and success at avoiding out-of-home placement, or reducing the length of stay in out-of-home placement. A county shall not expend more funds for services under this subdivision than that amount which would be expended for placement in out-of-home care.

(ii) This subparagraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026.

(B) (i) Each service provider, at the time the provider is selected by a participating county, shall provide services that are reasonable, meritorious, and that demonstrated cost-effectiveness and success at avoiding out-of-home placement, or reducing the length of stay in out-of-home placement. A county
 shall not expend more funds for services under this subdivision than that amount which would be expended for placement in out-of-home care. Service providers selected shall be reviewed for reasonableness, merit, and whether they demonstrated cost-effectiveness and success at avoiding out-of-home placement, or reducing the length of stay in out-of-home placement no less than every three years after selection.

(ii) This subparagraph shall become operative on January 1, 2026. Counties shall implement the requirements of this subparagraph in the next grant or selection cycle commencing on or after January 1, 2026.

(5) (A) The services provided pursuant to this section in each county shall be deemed successful if they
 meet the following standards:

(i) The services enable families to resolve their own problems, effectively utilize service systems, and advocate for their children in educational and social agencies.

(ii) The services enhance family functioning by building on family strengths.

(iii) At least 75 percent of the children receiving services remain in their own home for six months after termination of services.

(iv) During the first year after services are terminated, the following criteria are met:

(I) At least 60 percent of the children receiving services remain at home one year after services are terminated.

(II) The average length of stay in out-of-home care of children selected to receive services who have already been removed from their home and placed in out-of-home care is 50 percent less than the average length of stay in out-of-home care of children who do not receive program services.

(III) No more than 25 percent of children whose parents or guardian received services are children who meet any of the following circumstances, with that percentage limit separately applicable to each circumstance:

(ia) Are removed from the physical custody of their parents or guardian pursuant to Section 300 or subdivision (e) of Section 364.

(ib) Are removed from the physical custody of their parents or guardian pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, of Section 361.

(ic) Are determined to probably soon be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 301.

(id) Have been adjudged wards of the court pursuant to Section 601 or 602.

(ie) Are families of children subject to Sections 726 and 727.

(if) Are children who are determined to require out-of-home placement.

(v) Two years after the termination of family preservation services, the following criteria are met:

(I) The average length of out-of-home stay of children selected to receive services
 under this section who, at the time of selection, are in out-of-home care, is 50 percent less than the average length of stay in out-of-home care for children in out-of-home care who do not receive services pursuant to this section.

(II) At least 60 percent of the children who were returned home pursuant to this section remain at home.

(III) No more than 10 percent of children whose parents or guardian received services are children who meet any of the circumstances listed in subclause (III) of clause (iv) with that percentage limit separately applicable to each circumstance.

(IV) No children who were returned home died or nearly died due to abuse or neglect.

(B) The requirements in subclause (III) of clause (iv) of subparagraph (A), and subclauses (III) and (IV) of clause (v) of subparagraph (A) shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(6) Funds used for services provided under this section shall supplement, not supplant, child welfare services funds available for services pursuant to Sections 16506 and 16507.

(7) Programs authorized after the original pilot projects shall submit data to the department upon the department’s request.

(d) (1) A county welfare department social worker or probation officer may, pursuant to an appropriate court order, return a dependent minor or ward of the court removed
 from the home pursuant to Section 361 to the dependent minor’s or ward’s home, with appropriate interagency family preservation program services.

(2) The county probation department may, with the approval of the State Department of Social Services, through an interagency
 agreement with the county welfare department, refer cases to the county welfare department for the direct provision of services under this subdivision.

(e) Foster care funds shall remain within the administrative authority of the county welfare department and shall be used only for placement services or placement prevention services or county welfare department administrative cost related to the interagency family preservation program.

(f) To the extent permitted by federal law, any federal funds provided for services to families and children may be utilized for the purposes of this section.

(g) A county may establish family preservation programs that serve one or more geographic areas of the county,
 subject to the approval of the State Department of Social Services.

(1) All funds expended by a county for activities under this section shall be expended by the county in a manner that will maximize eligibility for federal financial participation.

(2) A county, subject to the approval of the State Department of Social Services, may claim federal financial participation, if allowable and available, as provided by the State Department of Social Services in the federal Promoting Safe and Stable Families program in accordance with the federal guidelines and regulations for that county’s AFDC­FC expenditures pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 11450, for children subject to Sections 300, 301, 360, and 364, in advance, provided that the county conducts a program of family reunification
 and family maintenance services for families receiving these services pursuant to Sections 300, 301, 360, and 364, and as permitted by the department, children subject to Sections 601, 602, 726, and 727 of this code and Section 7572.5 of the Government Code.

(h) In order to maintain federal funding and meet federal requirements, the State Department of Social Services and the Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall provide administrative oversight, monitoring, and consultation to ensure both of the following:

(1) (A) Each county includes in its county plan information that details what services are to be funded under this section and who will be served, and how the services are coordinated with the array of services available in the county. In order to
 maintain federal funding to meet federal requirements, the State Department
 of Social Services shall review these plans and provide technical assistance as needed, as provided in Section 10601.2. In order to meet federal requirements, the Office of Child Abuse Prevention shall require counties to submit annual reports, as part of the current reporting process, on program services and children and families served. The annual reporting process shall be developed jointly by the department and county agencies for the purpose of meeting federal reporting requirements.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2026, the annual reports described in subparagraph (A) shall include the information and data described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c),
 demonstrating whether the services meet the standards for being deemed successful,
 the name of each provider of services described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), and whether the provider’s services were deemed successful pursuant to that paragraph. Within 30 business days of receipt of an annual report from a county, the department shall post the annual report to its internet website.
